en: blueberry filling
bg: пълнеж от боровинки
ca: farcellet de nabiu
da: blåbærfyldning
de: Heidelbeerfüllung
es: relleno de arándanos
fi: mustikkatäyte
fr: garniture aux myrtilles
hr: punilo od borovnice, punjenje od borovnica
it: ripieno di mirtilli
nl: blauwebessen vulling
sv: blåbärsfyllning

en: loganberry, loganberries
fr: mûroise
hr: loganova bobica
it: loganberry
la: Rubus loganobaccus

en: dewberry, dewberries, youngberry, youngberries
it: mora di rovo
la: Rubus caesius

en: boysenberry, boysenberries
bg: бойсен
ca: boysenberry
da: boysenbær
de: boysenbeere, boysenbeeren
fi: boysenmarja
fr: boysenberry
hr: dječačka bobica
it: boysenberry
ja: ボイセンベリー
ko: 보이즌베리
nb: boysenbær
nl: boysenbes
pl: boysenberry
pt: boysenberry
ru: бойзенова ягода
sv: boysenbär

en: boysenberry juice
de: Boysenbeersaft
fi: boysenmarjamehu, boysenmarjatäysmehu
hr: sok od bobica
it: succo di boysenberry
sv: boysenbärsjuice

en: carambola, star fruit
ar: قلنباق
as: কৰ্দ্দৈ
bg: карамбол, карамбола
bn: কামরাঙা
ca: caramboler
ch: bilembines
cs: karambola, čínská hvězdice
da: karambole, stjernefrugt
de: Karambole, Baumstachelbeere
dv: ކާމަރަނގަ
el: καραμπόλα
eo: karambolfrukto
es: carambolo, fruta de estrella
et: karamboola
fa: میوه ستاره‌سان
fi: karambola
fr: carambole
ga: toradh réaltúil
gl: carambola
he: קרמבולה
hi: कमरख
hr: karambola
ht: karanbòl
hu: csillaggyümölcs, carambola
hy: կարամբոլա
is: stjörnuávöxtur
it: carambola
ja: スターフルーツ
jv: belimbing, carambola, star fruit
kn: ಕಮರಾಕ್ಷಿ
ko: 카람볼라
kv: карамбола
la: averrhoa carambola
ln: pakapáka
lt: karambola
lv: karambola
ml: ആരംപുളി
mr: कमरक
ms: belimbing besi, ڤوکوق بليمبيڠ بسي‎‎
my: စောင်းလျားပင်
nb: stjernefrukt
ne: कन्तर
nl: stervrucht, carambola, sterfruit
or: କରମଙ୍ଗା
pl: karambola, karamboli
pt: caramboleiro, carambola
ro: carambola
ru: карамбола
sd: ڪمرنگو
si: කාමරංගා
sk: karambola, čínska hviezdica
sq: starfruit
sr: карамбола, karambola
su: balimbing
sv: carambola
ta: விளிம்பிப்பழம்
te: నక్షత్ర ఫలం చెట్టు
th: มะเฟือง
tl: balimbing
to: tapanima
tr: yıldız meyvesi
ty: raparapa
uk: карамбола
vi: khế
zh: 楊桃

en: cloudberry, cloudberries, rubus chamaemorus, nordic berry, bakeapple, knotberry, knotberries, knoutberry
az: rubus chamaemorus
ba: мораҡ
be: марошка
ca: móra vermella
cs: ostružiník moruška
cy: llwyn mwyar y berwyn
da: multebær
de: moltebeere
eo: kamemoro
es: rubus chamaemorus
et: rabamurakas
fa: تمشک شمالی
fi: lakka, hilla
fr: plaquebière, mûre artique, mûres artiques, mûre polaire, mûres polaires
ga: eithreog shléibhe
hr: močvarna jagoda
ik: aqpik
is: múltuber
it: rubus chamaemorus
ja: ホロムイイチゴ
ko: 진들딸기
kv: мырпом
la: rubus chamaemorus
lt: paprastoji tekšė
lv: lācene
ms: rubus chamaemorus
nb: multe
nl: kruipbraam
nn: molte
os: цъымарайы мæнæргъы
pl: malina moroszka
pt: rubus chamaemorus
ru: морошка
se: luomi
sl: barjanska robida
sr: rubus chamaemorus
sv: hjortron
tr: rubus chamaemorus
tt: морак
uk: морошка
vi: rubus chamaemorus
zh: 雲莓

en: cherry, cherries
an: ziresa
ar: كرز
az: Albalı
ba: Сейә
be: чарэшня
bg: череша, череши
bn: চেরি
bo: སེའུ།
br: Kerez
bs: Trešnja
ca: cirera
co: Chjarasgia
cs: třešně
cu: черешьнѧ
cv: чие
cy: ceiriosen
da: kirsebær
de: Kirsch, Kirsche, Kirschen
el: Κεράσι
eo: ĉerizo
es: cereza, cerezas, guindas
et: kirsi, kirsid
eu: Gereziondo
fa: گیلاس
fi: kirsikka
fo: kirsiber
fr: cerise, cerises
fy: kers
ga: Silín
gd: siris
gl: Cereixa
gu: ચેરી
gy: shillish
he: דובדבן
hi: आलूबालू
hr: trešnja, trešnje
ht: Seriz
hu: cseresznye
hy: բալ
ia: ceresia
id: Ceri
io: cerizo
is: Kirsuber
it: ciliegie, ciliegia
ja: サクランボ
jv: Cèri
ka: ალუბალი
kk: шие
kn: ಚೆರಿ
ko: 버찌
ku: gêlaz
kw: keres
ky: арча
la: Cerasus
lb: Kiischt
li: kiesj
lo: ໝາກເຊີຣິ
lt: Vyšnia
lv: ķirši
mk: цреша
ml: ചെറി
mn: Интоор
mr: चेरी
ms: ceri
mt: ċirasa
nb: kirsebær
ne: चेरी
nl: kers, kersen
nv: Didzéchííʼ
oc: Cerièra
or: ଚେରୀ
os: Бал
pa: ਚੈਰੀ
pt: cereja
qu: Rinda
ro: cireașă
ru: вишня
sd: آلو بالو
se: čirsa
sh: Trešnja
sk: čerešňa
sl: Češnja
sq: qershia
sr: трешња
sv: körsbär
sw: cheri
ta: செர்ரி
te: చెర్రీ
tg: Олуболу
th: เชอร์รี่
tk: үлҗе
tl: Seresa
tr: kiraz
tt: Чия
ug: گىلاس
uk: вишня
ur: آلو بالو
uz: Olcha
vi: Anh đào
vo: cel
wa: Ceréjhe
wo: sëriis
zh: 樱

en: organic cherry
hr: eko višnja
it: ciliegia biologica

en: wild cherry
de: wilde Kirsche, wilde Kirschen
es: cereza silvestre, cerezas silvestres
fr: cerise sauvage, cerises sauvages
hr: divlja trešnja
it: ciliegia selvatica, ciliegie selvatiche

en: Pitted cherry
bg: Обезкостени череши
de: entsteinte Kirschen, entkernte Kirschen
es: cereza deshuesada, cereza sin hueso, cerezas deshuesadas, cerezas sin hueso
fr: Cerise dénoyautée
hr: trešnja bez koštice
it: ciliegia denocciolata

en: cherry juice
bg: сок от череши
de: Kirschsaft
es: Jugo de cereza
fi: kirsikkamehu
fr: jus de cerise
hr: sok višnje
it: Succo di ciliegia
nl: kersensap
pl: sok wiśniowy, sok z wiśni
ru: Вишневый сок

en: cherry juice from concentrated cherry juice
bg: сок от череши от концентрат
de: Kirschsaft aus Kirschsaftkonzentrat
hr: sok višnje od koncentriranog soka višnje
it: succo di ciliegia da succo di ciliegia concentrato
pl: sok wiśniowy z zagęszczonego soku wiśniowego
ro: suc de cireșe din suc concentrat de cireș

en: white cherry
bg: бели череши
it: ciliegia bianca

en: black cherry
bg: черни череши
de: schwarze Kirsche, Schwarzkirsche
es: cereza negra
fi: musta kirsikka
fr: cerise noire, cerises noires
hr: crna trešnja
it: ciliegie nere
nl: zwarte kers

en: sour cherry, sour cherries
bg: вишна, вишни
de: Sauerkirsch, Sauerkirsche, Sauerkirschen
es: Cereza agria
fi: hapankirsikka, hapankirsikat
fr: griotte, griottes, cerises griottes
hr: višnja, višnje, od višnje
it: amarene
la: prunus cerasus
nl: morellen, kriek, krieken, zure kers
pl: wiśnia, wiśnie, wiśniowy, wiśniowe, wiśniowa, wiśniowego, wiśniowych, wiśniowej, wiśni
pt: ginjas

en: sour cherry juice
bg: сок от вишни, сок от вишна
de: Sauerkirschsaft, Sauerkirschensaft
fi: hapankirsikkamehu
fr: jus de cerise aigre
hr: koncentrirani sok višnje
it: Succo di amarena

de: Sauerkirschsaft aus Sauerkirschsaftkonzentrat
hr: sok višnje od koncentriranog soka, sok od višnje od koncentriranog soka

en: cherry preparation
hr: pripravak trešnja
it: preparazione di ciliegie

en: sweet cherry
ar: كرز حلو
az: Gilas
bg: дива череша
bo: ཁམ་ཤིང་།
ca: cirerer
cs: třešeň ptačí
cy: Coeden geirios du
da: Fugle-Kirsebær
de: Vogel-Kirsche, Vogelkirsche
el: Κερασιά
eo: Ĉerizarbo
et: Magus kirsipuu
eu: Basagereziondo
fa: گیلاس خودرو
fi: Imeläkirsikka
fr: bigarreaux, merisier
ga: Silín fiáin
gl: Cerdeira
gv: Shillish
hr: slatka trešnja
hu: Vadcseresznye
hy: կեռասենի
is: Fuglakirsuber
it: ciliegio
ja: セイヨウミザクラ
ka: ბალი
kk: Мойыл
ko: 양벚나무
ku: Gelyaz
la: Prunus avium
lt: Trešnė
lv: saldais ķirsis
nb: Morell
nl: Zoete kers
nn: Morell
oc: Cerièr
os: Гуырдзиаг бал
pl: czereśnia, czereśnie, czereśniowy, czereśniowa, czereśniowe, czereśniowego, czereśniowych, czereśniowej
ro: Cireș
ru: Черешня
sc: Cariasa
sk: čerešňa vtáčia
sv: Sötkörsbär
tg: Гелос
tt: Төче чия
uk: Черешня
uz: Gilos
vi: anh đào dại
vo: Murõlipuu
wa: Såvaedje tchersî
zh: 欧洲甜樱桃